Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201269-406.01
Manhole cover or sewer grate; purchase
or receipt; limitations; payment.

No secondary metals recycler shall purchase or receive any
manhole cover or sewer grate except from (1) an authorized representative
of the political subdivision that owns the manhole cover or sewer grate as
is evidenced by the stamping or engraving on the cover or grate or (2) a third
party who has a legitimate bill-of-sale, letter of authorization, or similar
approval from the political subdivision evidencing the third party's right
to possess and sell the cover or grate. Payment for a manhole cover or sewer
grate shall be by draft or check and sent by United States mail, postage prepaid,
to the official address of the finance department of such political subdivision
or to the third-party seller. Such draft or check shall be made payable only
to the political subdivision or to the third-party seller.

Laws 2012, LB1049, § 2.